test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kajash_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - каяш: # Verb-am 'appear; show'
     каяш+V+Inf: каяш
     каяш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: каям
     каяш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: каят
     каяш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: каеш
     каяш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: кайына
     каяш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: кайыда
     каяш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: кайыт
     
     каяш+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: кай
     каяш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: каеп
#    
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1: кайым
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2: кайыц
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: кайы
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1: кайна
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2: кайда
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: каевӹ
     
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt1+ConNeg: кай
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg: каеп
#    
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1: кайынам
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2: кайынат
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: кайын
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1: кайынна
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2: кайында
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: кайыныт
     
##   
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1: кайделам
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg2: кайделат
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: кайде
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1: кайделна
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl2: кайделда
     каяш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: кайделыт
##   
     каяш+V+Imprt+Sg3: кай
     каяш+V+Imprt+Sg3: кайжы
     каяш+V+Imprt+Pl3: кайда
     каяш+V+Imprt+Pl3: кайышты
##   
     каяш+V+ImprtII+Sg2: кайыма
     каяш+V+ImprtII+Pl2: кайымада
##   
     каяш+V+Des+Sg1: кайнем
     каяш+V+Des+Sg2: кайнет
     каяш+V+Des+Sg3: кайнежӹ
     каяш+V+Des+Pl1: кайненӓ
     каяш+V+Des+Pl2: кайнедӓ
     каяш+V+Des+Pl3: кайнештӹ
     
     
